Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.195

Renewable energy systems—Study code and adopt changes.

The state building code council, in consultation with the department of commerce and local governments, shall conduct a study of the state building code and adopt changes necessary to encourage greater use of renewable energy systems as defined in RCW 82.16.110.

[ 2019 c 235 s 6.]